Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.060

Compliance verification activities.

The department may take the following actions to verify produce farm compliance with the produce safety rule.

(1) Maintain a database of produce farms that are covered by the produce safety rule, exempt from the rule, or eligible for a qualified exemption;

(2) In compliance with law and at reasonable times, enter produce farms solely for the purpose of this chapter to:

(a) Sample and test water for microbial water quality criteria;

(b) Inspect and sample biological soil amendments, storage areas, and fields for compliance with microbial criteria;

(c) Inspect application of biological soil amendments to evaluate contact or potential contact with produce;

(d) Inspect for the presence and management of domesticated and wild animals; and

(e) Inspect equipment, tools, and buildings for adequate sanitation; and

(3) Require and receive records and data submitted by produce farms to verify compliance with the produce safety rule.

[ 2018 c 106 s 6.]